Washington statutes.
RCW 7.70.120

Mandatory mediation of health care claims—Right to trial not abridged.

RCW 7.70.100 may not be construed to abridge the right to trial by jury following an unsuccessful attempt at mediation.

[ 1993 c 492 s 421.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.